North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-28 Rights of County When Lands Not Redeemed
57-28-25.
Board of county commissioners may act as leasing agents or may employ a county land agent.

The board of county commissioners may not expend more than ten percent of the total lease revenue collected under this chapter for costs in connection with the supervision and collection of rentals. The board may authorize one or more of its members to act as the county land agent or employ a county land agent to manage, lease, and collect rentals for any property owned by the county. The county land agent must be bonded by the state bonding fund, in an amount determined by the board of county commissioners. The agent shall deposit all amounts collected with the county treasurer and obtain a receipt. The board of county commissioners shall fix the compensation and expenses of the agent, but the compensation and expenses may not exceed ten percent of the total revenue collected by the agent and must be paid out of the revenue from the rentals of county lands.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 237, § 3; 1941, ch. 127, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-2825; S.L. 1991, ch. 659, § 32.

57-28-26.
Disposition of rental revenue.

All the net revenue from leases of property under this chapter and all federal payments for property acquired by the county by tax deed must be paid into the county treasury. On or before January tenth in each year, the county treasurer shall apportion these amounts received in the previous calendar year to the county, city, school district, township, or other taxing districts in which the property is located in the proportion that the previous year’s general fund levy in the taxing district bears to the total of general fund levies of all taxing districts in which the property is located.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 237, § 4; 1941, ch. 287, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-2826; S.L. 1991, ch. 659, § 33.

57-28-27.
Discretion of county commissioners in lease or sale of tax deed lands.

The board of county commissioners may refuse to sell or lease any agricultural lands held by the county under a tax deed if the board finds that any of the following would result:

The use would seriously impair the fertility of the property or adjoining property due to wind or water erosion.

The property will become a part of an agricultural unit that will be too small or too large to be operated in the best interests of the community and taxing districts and the use may result in failure of the owner or lessee to pay taxes upon the property.

The use would result in lessening the value or marketability of adjacent property held by the county.

The board of county commissioners may classify agricultural lands held by the county according to suitability for tillage, haying, or grazing purposes. Applicants for deeds or leases may file with the county auditor a statement of the size of the farming unit for which the property is desired, the uses intended for the property, and any other information relative to the planned operation of the property which is required by the board of county commissioners.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 134, §§ 1 to 4; R.C. 1943, § 57-2827; S.L. 1991, ch. 659, § 34.

57-28-28.
County lien for costs of improvement to distressed property forfeited in tax foreclosure.

If property sold by the county under this chapter is sold for less than the total amount of the taxes due and the costs to improve salability of the property which were incurred by the county in cleanup, repairs, demolition, or other action necessary because of damage, neglect, or waste by the prior owner, those costs incurred by the county to improve salability which were not recovered by the county from the sale constitute a lien on any real property owned, or later acquired, in the county by that prior owner.

The county auditor shall extend and enter upon the tax list of real estate then in the hands of the county treasurer, opposite the description of real estate designated by the board of county commissioners which belongs to the prior owner, the year for which an obligation to the county exists under this section and the amount of that obligation. The entry must be made without regard to any prior payment of real estate taxes on those properties and the treasurer may not thereafter issue any receipt in full for real estate taxes on those properties without making collection at the same time of the obligation under this section. A taxpayer holding a specific superior lien on those properties ahead of a lien under this section is entitled to tax receipts without regard to nonpayment of obligations under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 518, § 2.

57-28-29.
Notice of tax delinquency — Central indexing system. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 257, § 47, eff March 1, 2016.